es: Sol desplazado de la flauta: Sol en línea; Sol desalineado; Otro
nl: Fluit offset G: In-line G; Offset G; Overige
pt-BR: Flauta com chave de Sol deslocada: Sol em linha; Sol desalinhado (Offset G); Outro
ro-RO: Flaut clapă Sol decalată (offset G): Sol în linie; Sol decalat; Altele
it: Flauto con sol fuori linea: Sol in linea; Sol fuori linea; Altro
bg-BG: Изнесено сол на флейтата: В една линия (Inline G); Изнесена клапа Сол (Offset G); Друг
pt-PT: Flauta deslocada G: Sol em linha; Sol desfasado; Outro
lt-LT: Fleitos paslinktas G: Vienoje linijoje esantis G; Paslinktas G; Kita
sk-SK: G klapka mimo osi flauty: Inline G; Offset G; Iné
vi: Khóa G lệch của sáo: Phím Sol thẳng hàng; Phím Sol lệch; Khác
zh-TW: 長笛偏置 G 鍵: 直列式 G 鍵; 曲列式 G 鍵; 其他
ja: フルートオフセットG: インライン; オフセット; その他
th: คีย์ตัว G ของฟลุตยื่นเอียงออกมาด้านหน้า: G แบบอินไลน์; G แบบออฟเซ็ต; อื่นๆ
da: Forskudt G på fløjte: Inline G; Offset G; Andet
fi: Huilun offset G: Inline G; Offset G; Muu
tr: Flütte ofset G tuş düzeni: Düz (Inline) G; Çapraz (Offset) G; Diğer
cs: Vysunuté G: V jedné řadě (Inline G); Předsazené G (Offset G); Ostatní
ko: 플루트 오프셋 G: 인라인 G; 오프셋 G; 기타
hr-HR: Pomak žljebova G: G u ravnini; Pomaknuti G; Ostalo
ru: Смещенная клавиша соль у флейты: Клапан Соль в линию; Смещенный клапан Соль; Другое
nb: Fløyteforskyvning G: Inline G; Offset G; Annet
el: Μετατοπισμένο G φλάουτου: Inline Σολ (G); Offset Σολ (G); Άλλο
zh-CN: 长笛偏移量 G: 直列 G 键; 曲列 G 键; 其他
de: Versetztes G der Flöte: Inline-G; Offset-G; Sonstiges
sv: Offset G för flöjt: Inline G; Offset G; Övrigt
pl: Przesunięcie fletu G: G w linii; G wysunięte; Inny
sl-SI: Odmik žlebov G: V liniji (inline G); Zamik (offset G); Drugo
fr: Sol décalé de la flûte: Sol en ligne; Sol décalé; Autre
hu: A fuvola G-billentyűjének eltolt elhelyezkedése: Soros G; Eltolt G; Egyéb
en: Flute offset G: Inline G; Offset G; Other